Indiana, session 2026, HB1159.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-34-3-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 52, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) For purposes of this section, "electronic
eye chart" means any computerized or other electronic system,
device, automated computer program, or method of displaying on
an electronic screen medically accepted and properly sized
optotypes, including letters, numbers, or symbols, that is used to
assess an individual's visual acuity.
(a) (b) For purposes of this section, "modified clinical technique"
means a battery of vision tests that includes:
(1) a visual acuity test to determine an individual's ability to see
at various distances;
(2) a refractive error test to determine the focusing power of the
eye;
(3) an ocular health test to determine any external or internal
abnormalities of the eye; and
(4) a binocular coordination test to determine if the eyes are
2026 IN 1159—LS 6749/DI 104


working together properly.
(b) (c) For purposes of this section, "vision screening" means the
testing of visual acuity to determine an individual's ability to see at
various distances using:
(1) the Snellen chart;
(2) Sloan letter charts;
(3) HOTV letter or LEA symbol charts for younger students; or
(4) subject to subsection (m), electronic eye charts; or
(4) (5) other technology devices, including photoscreens or
autorefractors, for a child who is unable to perform the tests
described in subdivisions (1) through (3);
at a distance of either ten (10) or twenty (20) feet for distance vision,
depending on the calibration of the chart being used, and a distance of
fourteen (14) inches for near vision.
(c) (d) The modified clinical technique shall be performed by an
ophthalmologist licensed as a physician under IC 25-22.5 or an
optometrist licensed under IC 25-24.
(d) (e) The governing body of each school corporation shall conduct
a vision test for each student enrolling in or transferring into:
(1) prekindergarten;
(1) (2) either kindergarten or grade 1;
(2) (3) grade 3;
(3) (4) grade 5; and
(4) (5) grade 8;
and for each student suspected of having a visual defect.
(e) (f) The vision test for students in kindergarten and grade 1 shall
be conducted using the modified clinical technique unless a waiver is
granted under section 13 of this chapter. If a waiver is granted for a
school corporation, the governing body shall conduct a vision screening
described in subsection (b) (c) upon each student's enrollment in
kindergarten or grade 1.
(f) (g) Each student described in subsection (d)(2), (e)(3), (d)(3),
(e)(4), and (d)(4), (e)(5), and each student suspected of having a visual
defect, shall be tested using a vision screening of the student's visual
acuity.
(g) (h) The following standards apply for a vision screening under
subsections (e) (f) and (f): (g):
(1) A student in prekindergarten, kindergarten, or grade 1 who
is unable to read with each eye the 20/30 line of the Snellen chart
or the 20/32 line of the Sloan letters, HOTV, or LEA symbol
optotypes shall be recommended for further examination based
upon the recommendation of the individual performing the
2026 IN 1159—LS 6749/DI 104


screening.
(2) A student:
(A) in grade 3, grade 5, or grade 8; or
(B) suspected of having a visual defect;
who is unable to read with each eye the 20/30 line of the Snellen
chart or the 20/32 line of the Sloan letters shall be recommended
for further examination based upon the recommendation of the
individual performing the screening.
(3) If a student at any grade level is recommended for further
examination, the school must provide a written recommendation
for further examination to the parent or legal guardian of the
student.
(h) (i) Records of all tests shall be made and continuously
maintained by the school corporation to provide information useful in
protecting, promoting, and maintaining the health of students. The
Indiana department of health, in consultation with the state board, shall
adopt rules concerning vision testing equipment, qualifications of
vision testing personnel, visual screening procedures, and criteria for
failure and referral in the screening tests based on accepted medical
practice and standards.
(i) (j) The school corporation's governing body and the
superintendent shall receive annually the following information
concerning the tests conducted under this section:
(1) The number of students eligible for testing, by grade.
(2) The number of students tested, by grade.
(3) The number of students by grade who were tested using the
modified clinical technique.
(4) The number of students by grade who were tested using a
vision screening.
(5) The number of students by grade who passed a test.
(6) The number of students by grade who failed a test or were
referred for further testing.
(7) The name of the individual or department that supervised the
testing.
(j) (k) Each school corporation shall annually provide to the
department, for each school within the school corporation, the
following information concerning the tests conducted under this
section:
(1) The number of students tested by grade.
(2) The number of students by grade who were tested using the
modified clinical technique.
(3) The number of students by grade who were tested using a
2026 IN 1159—LS 6749/DI 104


vision screening.
(4) The number of students who passed a test by grade. and
(5) The number of students who failed a test or who were referred
for further testing.
(k) (l) Not later than October 1 each year, the department shall
report for the previous school year:
(1) a compilation of the information received from school
corporations under subsection (j); (k);
(2) information received under section 13 of this chapter,
including:
(A) the number of school corporations that applied for a
waiver;
(B) the number of waivers approved;
(C) the number of waivers denied;
(D) the name of each school corporation that applied for a
waiver and whether the waiver was approved or denied; and
(E) the reason for the approval or denial;
(3) the total number of students eligible for testing; and
(4) the total number of students tested;
to the legislative council in electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(m) An electronic eye chart may only be used if the electronic
eye chart meets national standards of care and the guidelines set
forth in the most recent version of the Procedures for the
Evaluation of the Visual System by Pediatricians published by the
American Academy of Pediatrics.
SECTION 2. IC 20-34-3-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 53, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) If a school corporation is unable to comply
with section 12(e) 12(f) of this chapter, the governing body may, before
November 1 of a school year, request from the secretary of education
a waiver of the requirements of section 12(e) 12(f) of this chapter.
(b) The waiver request under subsection (a) must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) include the reason or reasons that necessitated the waiver
request; and
(3) indicate the extent to which the governing body attempted to
comply with the requirements under section 12(e) 12(f) of this
chapter.
(c) The secretary of education shall take action on the waiver
request not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the waiver request.
(d) The secretary of education may:
(1) approve the waiver request;
2026 IN 1159—LS 6749/DI 104


(2) deny the waiver request; or
(3) provide whatever relief that may be available to enable the
school corporation to comply with the requirements under section
12(e) 12(f) of this chapter.
(e) If the secretary of education approves the waiver request, the
governing body shall conduct an annual screening test of the visual
acuity of each student as described in section 12(b) 12(c) of this
chapter upon the student's enrollment in or transfer to grade 1.
(f) The governing body of each school corporation shall make and
maintain records of all waivers requested by the governing body under
this section.
(g) The secretary of education shall make and continuously maintain
records of all actions taken by the secretary of education concerning all
waivers requested under this section.
(h) A request for a waiver under this section must be made annually.
2026 IN 1159—LS 6749/DI 104